Tennessee, session 114, SB0569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-10-104(a), is amended by
inserting the language "a pharmacist authorized pursuant to § 63-10-204;" immediately
preceding "or a veterinarian".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-10-105, is amended by inserting
the language "pharmacist authorized pursuant to § 63-10-204," immediately preceding "or
veterinarian" wherever it appears in subsection (a) and subdivision (b)(2).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-10-219(e), is amended by
deleting the language "shall prohibit" and substituting "must not prohibit".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-10-219(f)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "who are insured or covered and receive a pharmacy benefit that covers
the cost of hormonal contraceptives shall not be required to pay an administrative fee. These
patients".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-32-137, is amended by deleting
the language "certified nurse midwives as described in § 56-7-2407, and" and substituting
"certified nurse midwives as described in § 56-7-2407, pharmacists as described in § 56-32-
129, and".
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0569
000645
- 1 -